Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1588.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 929(a) and (b) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 929. Revocation, suspension or denial of license, permit or registration.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, any hunting or furtaking license, special license or permit or registration granted under the authority of this title may be denied, revoked or suspended by the [commission] magisterial district judge or court having jurisdiction in a case coming before it involving an offense under this title when the holder of the license, permit or registration is convicted of an offense under this title or has acted contrary to the 1234567891011121314151617181920 intent of the registration or permit, with each offense constituting a separate violation subject to separate revocation. [The commission may refuse to grant to that person any permit or registration and may deny any privilege granted by these documents for a period not exceeding five years unless otherwise provided in this title.]* * *[(b) Regulations.--The commission may promulgate regulations specifying the procedures to be followed in denying, revoking or suspending any hunting and furtaking privileges, licenses, permits and registrations granted under the provisions of this title.]Section 2. Section 2741(b) and (c) of Title 34 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2741. Denial or revocation of licenses.* * *(b) Violations.--In addition to any penalty and costs imposed by this title, [the commission] a magisterial district judge or court having jurisdiction may revoke any hunting or furtaking license and deny any person the privilege to secure a license or to hunt or take furbearers anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, if the licensee or person:(1) Has either been convicted or signed an acknowledgment of guilt of violating any of the provisions of this title for such periods as are specified in this subchapter.(2) Has been [accused] charged by an officer of having violated any of the following provisions even though such person has not been convicted of a violation of these 20250HB1588PN1898 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sections:Section 2501 (relating to hunting or furtaking prohibited while under influence of alcohol or controlled substance).Section 2505 (relating to safety zones).Section 2509 (relating to damage to property).Section 2522 (relating to shooting at or causing injury to human beings).Section 2523 (relating to rendering assistance after incidents).(b.1) Restoration.--Upon charges brought under subsection (b)(2) being dropped or dismissed or upon being found not guilty of violating the sections listed under subsection (b)(2), the person's license or privilege shall be restored immediately.[(c) Authority of court.--Any magisterial district judge or court having jurisdiction in any case coming before it involving any of the offenses contained in this title may revoke a hunting or furtaking license and deny the privilege to secure a license or to hunt or take furbearers anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, as set forth in this title.]Section 3. Section 2742(a) and (b) of Title 34 are amended to read:§ 2742. Period of revocation.(a) First offense.--Except as otherwise provided, for the first offense any person convicted or having signed an acknowledgment of guilt of violating any of the provisions of this title may be denied the privilege to hunt or take wildlife anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, for a period not to exceed three years as the [commission] magisterial district judge or court having jurisdiction determines.20250HB1588PN1898 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Second or subsequent offense.--Except as otherwise provided, any person convicted or having signed an acknowledgment of guilt of a second or subsequent offense of violating any of the provisions of this title may be denied the privilege to hunt or take game or wildlife anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, for [such period as the commission determines.] a period not to exceed five years, as the magisterial district judge or court having jurisdiction determines.* * *Section 4. The amendment or addition of 34 Pa.C.S. § 929(a) and (b), 2741(b), (b.1) and (c) and 2742(a) and (b) shall apply to the revocation of hunting or furtaking privileges, or both, which have been revoked on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1588PN1898 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516